Florida, session 2026, HB1073.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1001.366, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1001.366 District School Board Members' Bill of Rights.—A
member of a district school board has the right to:
(1) Upon request, be given free and timely access to all
school district documents necessary to fulfill the duties and
responsibilities required under the State Constitution and the
Florida Early Learning-20 Education Code. Access to documents
that are confidential or exempt from public disclosure must be
provided in compliance with applicable law. A request not
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1073 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1073, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
related to a matter on a publicly noticed meeting of the
district school board must be fulfilled within 10 business days
after receipt of such request. Any document provided to a
district school board member must be offered to all board
members.
(2) Consult with the school district's chief financial
officer on general matters related to the budget and sources and
uses of school district funds, and have reasonable access, upon
request, to any detail or line item in any proposed or approved
budget or in any financial transaction by the school district.
(3) Request any document or information, except for
documents or information that the member would be prohibited by
law from accessing, from school district staff with the
permission of the superintendent or other members of the
administration where such permission may not be unreasonably
withheld.
(4) Comment publicly during or outside of district school
board meetings on any matter of district school board business,
except for student and employee disciplinary hearings that are
specifically addressed in ss. 1006.07 and 1012.34, respectively,
or other matters prohibited by law.
Section 2. Paragraph (c) is added to subsection (1) of
section 1001.42, Florida Statutes, to read:
1001.42 Powers and duties of district school board.—The
district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1073 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1073, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
powers and perform all duties listed below:
(1) REQUIRE MINUTES AND RECORDS TO BE KEPT.—Require the
district school superintendent, as secretary, to keep such
minutes and records as are necessary to set forth clearly all
actions and proceedings of the school board.
(c) Other records.—Other documents, including attachments
for agenda items, such as vendor contracts or budget documents,
must be kept as a public record with the minutes of each
meeting.
Section 3. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
1012.22, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (k) is
added to that subsection, to read:
1012.22 Public school personnel; powers and duties of the
district school board.—The district school board shall:
(1) Designate positions to be filled, prescribe
qualifications for those positions, and provide for the
appointment, compensation, promotion, suspension, and dismissal
of employees as follows, subject to the requirements of this
chapter:
(a) Positions, qualifications, and appointments.—
1. The district school board shall act upon written
recommendations submitted by the district school superintendent
for positions to be filled, for minimum qualifications for
personnel for the various positions, and for the persons
nominated to fill such positions.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1073 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1073, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
2. The district school board may reject for good cause any
employee nominated.
3. If the third nomination by the district school
superintendent for any position is rejected for good cause, if
the district school superintendent fails to submit a nomination
for initial employment within a reasonable time as prescribed by
the district school board, or if the district school
superintendent fails to submit a nomination for reemployment
within the time prescribed by law, the district school board may
proceed on its own motion to fill such position.
4. The district school board's decision to reject a
person's nomination does not give that person a right of action
to sue over the rejection and may not be used as a cause of
action by the nominated employee.
5. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "good
cause" means the district school board has determined any of the
following:
a. That the nominated employee fabricated or materially
exaggerated his or her credentials or background.
b. That the nominated employee does not meet the minimum
requirements for the position.
c. That the nominated employee's educator certificate has
been revoked by another state.
(k) Nondisclosure or confidentiality.—A school district
100 employee may not be required or otherwise incentivized to sign a
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1073 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 1073, Engrossed 2 2026 Legislature
101 nondisclosure agreement or confidentiality agreement. A school
102 district may not impose conditions on employment to circumvent
103 this paragraph.
104 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1073 -03-er